Illinois, session 104th, HB3333.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 3.1-55-30 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-55-30 new)7    Sec. 3.1-55-30. Outside counsel restriction. If a 8municipality employs a municipal officer with the purpose of 9providing legal counsel to the corporate authorities of the 10municipality or to represent the municipality in legal 11proceedings, including, but not limited to, a city attorney, 12then the corporate authorities of the municipality shall not 13employ or seek outside counsel to represent the municipality. 14This Section does not prohibit the corporate authorities of a 15municipality from seeking outside counsel to represent the 16municipality if the corporate authorities believe in good 17faith that there is a conflict of interest with regard to the 18municipal officer with the purpose of providing legal counsel 19to the corporate authorities of the municipality or to 20represent the municipality in legal proceedings.